Washington statutes.
RCW 35.57.070

Service provider agreements.

The public facilities district may secure services by means of an agreement with a service provider. The public facilities district shall publish notice, establish criteria, receive and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with respondents under requirements set forth by district resolution.

[ 1999 c 165 s 7.]